Arkansas, session 2025, HB1906.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-16-304(1), concerning the public policy
of the state under the Arkansas Family Planning Act and the availability of
certain procedures, supplies, and information, is amended to read as follows:
(1) All Except as provided in § 20-9-607, all medically
acceptable contraceptive procedures, supplies, and information shall be
available through legally recognized channels to each person desirous of the
procedures, supplies, and information regardless of sex, race, age, income,
number of children, marital status, citizenship, or motive;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 9, Subchapter 6, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-9-607. Written consent — Long-acting reversible contraception.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a healthcare
*JMB347*
03/31/2025 10:26:43 AM JMB347

HB1906
provider shall require written consent from a parent or legal guardian before
prescribing long-acting reversible contraception to a person who is younger
than eighteen (18) years of age.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply if the person is an
emancipated minor.































03/31/2025 10:26:43 AM JMB347